North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-12.1 Honey Promotion Act [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18]

4-12.1-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-12.1-02.
Assessment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-12.1-03.
Fees — Special fund — Continuing appropriation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-12.1-04.
Refunds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-12.1-05.
Delinquent assessment remittance. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-12.1-06.
Collection of unpaid assessments. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-12.1-07.
Commissioner to effectuate purposes of this chapter — Advice of the association sought. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-12.1-08.
Honey information in report. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-12.1-09.
Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.